Hawaii statutes.
TITLE 4.
STATE ORGANIZATION AND

ADMINISTRATION,
GENERALLY

Chapter

26 Executive and Administrative Departments

26H Hawaii Regulatory Licensing Reform Act

27 State Functions and Responsibilities

27C State Information Service

27G Access Hawaii Committee

28 Attorney General

29 Federal Aid

30 Gubernatorial Transition

CHAPTER 26

EXECUTIVE
AND ADMINISTRATIVE DEPARTMENTS

Part I. Organization, Generally

Section

26-1 Office of the lieutenant governor

26-2 Order of succession to offices of governor
and

lieutenant governor

26-3 Position of administrative director
created

26-4 Structure of government

26-5 Department of human resources development

26-6 Department of accounting and general
services

26-7 Department of the attorney general

26-8 Department of budget and finance

26-9 Department of commerce and consumer
affairs

26-10 Department of taxation

26-11 University of Hawaii

26-12 Department of education

26-13 Department of health

26-14 Department of human services

26-14.5 Repealed

26-14.6 Department of public safety

26-15 Department of land and natural resources

26-16 Department of agriculture

26-17 Department of Hawaiian home lands

26-18 Department of business, economic
development, and

tourism

26-19 Department of transportation

26-20 Department of labor and industrial
relations

26-21 Department of defense

26-22 Transfer of functions

26-23 Assignment of functions

26-24 Agencies and offices abolished

26-25 Services to the judiciary and legislature

Part II. Other General Provisions

26-31 Selection and terms of single executives
as heads of

departments

26-32 Acting heads of departments; appointment
of;

responsibility for acts of

26-33 Performance of duties of vacant office

26-34 Selection and terms of members of boards
and

commissions

26-35 Administrative supervision of boards and
commissions

26-35.5 Members of boards and commissions;
immunity from or

indemnification for civil liability;
defense of

members

26-36 Acting members of boards

26-37 Substitutes for officials called into
active service

26-38 Powers and duties of heads of departments

26-39 Department staffs

26-40 Repealed

26-41 Temporary boards and commissions

Part III. Salaries, Certain State Officers

26-51 Governor; lieutenant governor

26-52 Department heads and executive officers

26-53 Deputies or assistants to department heads

26-54 Administrative director of the State

26-55 Repealed

26-56 Commission on salaries

Note

Pilot project for efficiency measures to be included with
budget documents submitted to the legislature; report to 2017 legislature;
auditor report (no later than March 1, 2017). L 2015, c 67.

Same day website postings of finance and executive
memorandums and administrative directives. L 2013, c 134, §137.

Cross References

Access Hawaii committee (management of State's internet
portal), see chapter 27G.

Council, board, and commission members; training on native
Hawaiian and Hawaiian traditional and customary rights, see chapter 10, part
III.

Emergency management, see chapter 127A.

Uniform electronic transactions act, see chapter 489E.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next